Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.16.050

Recording of ordinance and plat on effective date of reduction.

Upon the effective date of the ordinance a certified copy thereof together with a map showing the corporate limits as altered shall be filed and recorded in the office of the county auditor of the county in which the code city is situated, and thereupon the boundaries shall be as set forth therein.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.16.050.]